Montana, session 2025, HB650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 90-5-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"90-5-101. Definitions. As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, the following
definitions apply:
(1) "Agricultural enterprises" includes but is not limited to producing, warehousing, storing,
fattening, treating, handling, distributing, or selling farm products or livestock.
(2) "Bonds" means bonds, refunding bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by a municipality or
county under the authority of this part, including without limitation short-term bonds or notes issued in
anticipation of the issuance of long-term bonds or notes.
(3) "Electric energy generation facility" means any combination of a physically connected
generator or generators, associated prime movers, and other associated property and transmission facilities
and upgrades and improvements of transmission facilities, including appurtenant land and improvements and
personal property, that are normally operated together to produce and transfer electric power. The term
includes but is not limited to generating facilities that produce and transfer electricity from coal-fired steam
turbines, oil or gas turbines, wind turbines, solar power sources, fuel cells, or turbine generators that are driven
by falling water.
(4) "Family services provider" means organizations, including nonprofit corporations, that provide
human services for children and adults, including but not limited to early care services for children, youth
services, health services, social services, habilitative services, rehabilitative services, preventive care, and
supportive services, and training, educational, and referral activities in support of human services.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 650
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 650
(5) "Governing body" means the board or body in which the general legislative powers of the
municipality or county are vested.
(6) "Higher education facilities" means any real or personal properties required or useful for the
operation of an institution of higher education.
(7) "Institution of higher education" means any private, nonprofit corporation or institution within the
state of Montana:
(a) authorized to provide or operate educational facilities; and
(b) providing a program of education beyond the high school level.
(8) "Mortgage" means a mortgage or deed of trust or other security device.
(9) "Municipality" means any incorporated city or town in the state.
(10) "Project" means:
(a) any land, any building or other improvement, and any other real or personal property
considered necessary in connection with the improvement, whether or not now in existence, that must be
suitable for use for commercial, manufacturing, agricultural, or industrial enterprises;
(b) recreation or tourist facilities;
(c) local, state, and federal governmental facilities;
(d) multifamily housing, hospitals, long-term care facilities, community-based facilities for
individuals who are persons with developmental disabilities as defined in 53-20-102, or medical facilities;
(e) higher education facilities;
(f) electric energy generation facilities;
(g) family services provider facilities;
(h) any facilities that are used or considered necessary to create or produce any intangible item, as
defined in section 197(d)(1)(C)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 197(d)(1)(C)(iii), including any
patent, copyright, formula, process, design, pattern, knowledge, format, or other similar intangible item;
(i) the production of energy using an alternative renewable energy source as defined in 15-6-225;
and
(j) providing broadband service exclusively to unserved areas and underserved areas as
defined in 90-1-602 or to locations where broadband is available only by satellite technologies; and
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 650
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 650
(k) any combination of projects in subsections (10)(a) through (10)(i) (10)(j)."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2028.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 650
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 650, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 650
INTRODUCED BY C. HINKLE, M. BERTOGLIO, K. ZOLNIKOV, L. BREWSTER, N. DURAM, B. MITCHELL
AN ACT AUTHORIZING STATE BONDING FOR BROADBAND SERVICES; REVISING THE DEFINITION OF
PROJECT; AND AMENDING SECTION 90-5-101, MCA; AND PROVIDING A DELAYED EFFECTIVE DATE.”